Colorado, session 2026A, SB073.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 14-10-129.7 as
follows:
14-10-129.7. Additional parenting time to compensate for
denial of court-ordered parenting time.
(1) UNLESS A PARENT OR LEGAL CUSTODIAN SHOWS GOOD CAUSE
AS TO WHY AN ORDER FOR ADDITIONAL PARENTING TIME SHOULD NOT BE
ISSUED, THE COURT SHALL ORDER ADDITIONAL PARENTING TIME TO
COMPENSATE A PARENT OR LEGAL CUSTODIAN WHO WAS WRONGFULLY
DENIED COURT-ORDERED PARENTING TIME IF:
(a) THE DENIAL RESULTED FROM AN INVESTIGATION BY A LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY, CHILD WELFARE AGENCY, OR COUNTY
DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN OR SOCIAL SERVICES; AND
(b) THE INVESTIGATION DID NOT RESULT IN A FINDING OF ABUSE
OR NEGLECT.
(2) THE ADDITIONAL PARENTING TIME:
(a) MUST BE OF THE SAME TYPE AND DURATION AS THE PARENTING
TIME THAT WAS WRONGFULLY DENIED;
(b) MAY INCLUDE WEEKEND, HOLIDAY, OR VACATION PERIODS;
AND
(c) MUST BE EXERCISED, AS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS
SECTION, NO LATER THAN TWO YEARS AFTER THE DATE THE COURT FINDS
THAT PARENTING TIME WAS WRONGFULLY DENIED.
-2- SB26-073

(3) THE PARENT OR LEGAL CUSTODIAN WHO WAS WRONGFULLY
DENIED PARENTING TIME MAY SELECT DATES AND TIMES FOR THE
ADDITIONAL PARENTING TIME GRANTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1) OF
THIS SECTION WITHIN THE LIMITATIONS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (2) OF
THIS SECTION AND IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THE COURT
ORDER.
(4) THIS SECTION DOES NOT:
(a) CREATE A CAUSE OF ACTION AGAINST THE DEPARTMENT OF
HUMAN SERVICES, A CHILD WELFARE AGENCY, OR A LAW ENFORCEMENT
AGENCY; OR
(b) CONSTITUTE A MATERIAL OR SUBSTANTIAL CHANGE IN
CIRCUMSTANCES SUFFICIENT TO MODIFY A PARENTING TIME ORDER
ENTERED BEFORE THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION.
(5) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO ALL PARENTING TIME DISPUTES OR
MOTIONS FILED ON OR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION. AN
ACTION IN WHICH A FINAL PARENTING TIME ORDER WAS ENTERED BEFORE
THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION IS GOVERNED BY THE LAW IN EFFECT
AT THE TIME OF THAT PARENTING TIME ORDER.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
-3- SB26-073

November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-4- SB26-073